Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.013

Requests for nonconviction criminal history fingerprint record checks for agency heads—"Agency head" defined.

When requested by the governor or the director of the department of enterprise services, nonconviction criminal history fingerprint record checks shall be conducted through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of investigation on applicants for agency head positions appointed by the governor. Information received pursuant to this section shall be confidential and made available only to the governor or director of financial management or their employees directly involved in the selection, hiring, or background investigation of the subject of the record check. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the criminal history record check. "Agency head" as used in this section has the same definition as provided in RCW 34.05.010.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 320; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 454; 2006 c 45 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.